Maryland, session 2026, SB0985.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Correctional facility” means a facility that is operated for the purpose of
detaining or confining adults who are charged with or found guilty of a crime.
(j) “Immigration detention facility” means any building, facility, or structure
used, in whole or in part, to house or detain individuals for federal civil immigration
violations.
(k) “Incarcerated individual” means an individual who is actually or
constructively detained or confined in a correctional facility.
(l) “Local correctional facility” means a correctional facility that is operated:
(1) by one or more counties; or
(2) by a municipal corporation.
(q) (1) “State correctional facility” means a correctional facility that is
operated by the State.
(2) “State correctional facility” includes:
(i) the Patuxent Institution;
(ii) the Baltimore City Detention Center; and

SENATE BILL 985 3
(iii) the centralized booking facility in Baltimore City that is operated
by the Division of Pretrial Detention and Services in the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services.
8–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Approved standards” means the standards described in § 8–103(b) of this
subtitle.
(C) “BREACH OF THE SECURITY OF A SYSTEM” MEANS THE UNAUTHORIZED
ACQUISITION OF COMPUTERIZED DATA THAT COMPROMISES THE SECURITY,
CONFIDENTIALITY, OR INTEGRITY OF PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION
MAINTAINED IN THE SYSTEM.
(D) “CIVIL DETAINEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ACTUALLY OR
CONSTRUCTIVELY DETAINED OR CONFINED IN AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION
FACILITY.
[(c)] (E) “Commission” means the Maryland Commission on Correctional
Standards.
(F) “LICENSED HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE A HEALTH
OCCUPATION UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
[(d)] (G) “Minimum mandatory standards” means the standards described in §
8–103(a) of this subtitle.
(H) “PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 8–301 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
8–102.
The General Assembly finds that there is a need to improve the method of:
(1) establishing standards for correctional facilities, IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITIES, and programs [and of]; AND
(2) ensuring compliance with these standards to better protect the health,
safety, and welfare of the public by reducing incidents of crime.
8–103.

SENATE BILL 985
(a) (1) With the advice of the Commission, the Secretary shall adopt
regulations that establish minimum mandatory standards applicable to:
(I) security and CONTROL OF incarcerated [individual control,
incarcerated individual] INDIVIDUALS AND CIVIL DETAINEES;
(II) safety[, incarcerated individual] OF INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS AND CIVIL DETAINEES, INCLUDING LIFE AND FIRE SAFETY;
(III) food services[, incarcerated individual] FOR INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS AND CIVIL DETAINEES;
(IV) housing and sanitation[, incarcerated] FOR INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS AND CIVIL DETAINEES, INCLUDING MAXIMUM OCCUPANCY
RESTRICTIONS;
(V) individual rights[, classification, hearings,] AND HEARINGS
FOR INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS AND CIVIL DETAINEES;
(VI) CLASSIFICATION, victim notification, AND restitution, AS
APPLICABLE TO INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS AND CIVIL DETAINEES; and
(VII) administrative record keeping FOR INCARCERATED
INDIVIDUALS AND CIVIL DETAINEES.
(2) The minimum mandatory standards adopted under paragraph (1) of
this subsection shall apply to all State and local correctional facilities AND IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITIES LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(b) (1) With the advice of the Commission, the Secretary shall adopt
regulations that establish approved standards applicable to personnel, training,
administration, management, planning and coordination, research and evaluation,
physical plant, special management incarcerated individuals, rules and discipline, mail and
visiting, reception and orientation, property control, work programs, educational and
vocational training, library services, religious services, recreational activities, counseling,
release preparation, and volunteers.
(2) The approved standards adopted under paragraph (1) of this
subsection:
(i) shall apply to all State correctional facilities; and
(ii) may be adopted, as a whole or in part, by a local correctional
facility.

SENATE BILL 985 5
(c) The standards adopted under this section shall be consistent with federal and
State law.
8–105.
The standards adopted under § 8–103 of this subtitle shall be enforced as provided
under §§ 8–112 through [8–114] 8–114.1 of this subtitle.
8–106.
There is a Maryland Commission on Correctional Standards in the Department.
8–110.
(a) (1) The Commission shall report annually to the Governor and, subject to
§ 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on the activities of the
Commission.
(2) THE ANNUAL REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) A DETAILED ANALYSIS OF COMPLIANCE ISSUES AT
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES AND IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITIES; AND
(II) RECOMMENDATIONS TO ADDRESS COMPLIANCE ISSUES
IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(3) THE REPORT PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT DISCLOSE
PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR A
CIVIL DETAINEE.
(b) The Commission shall provide the Secretary and the governing body of each
county and municipal corporation that has a correctional facility OR AN IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITY with a copy of its annual report.
8–111.1.
(A) (1) ANY PERSON MAY REPORT A VIOLATION OF THE MINIMUM
MANDATORY STANDARDS BY A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITY TO THE COMMISSION.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH A STANDARDIZED PROCESS
FOR THE REPORTING, RECEIPT, AND TIMELY REVIEW OF REPORTED VIOLATIONS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 985
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE AND MAINTAIN A LINK
ON THE COMMISSION’S WEBSITE FOR THE PUBLIC TO REPORT A VIOLATION.
(II) THE LINK PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL ALLOW A VIOLATION TO BE REPORTED ANONYMOUSLY.
(4) THE COMMISSION AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL MAINTAIN THE
CONFIDENTIALITY OF ANY PERSONAL IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF AN
INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL OR A CIVIL DETAINEE THAT IS PROVIDED IN A REPORT.
(5) AFTER COMPLETING REVIEW OF A VIOLATION REPORTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY:
(I) INSPECT THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR THE
IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–113 OF THIS
SUBTITLE;
(II) SEND A COMPLIANCE PLAN TO THE CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY OR THE IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
8–114 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(III) DETERMINE THAT THE FACILITY IS LIFE–THREATENING OR
HEALTH–ENDANGERING AND ORDER THE IMMEDIATE CESSATION OF OPERATION OF
THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR THE IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–115 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(IV) TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE
HEALTH AND SAFETY OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS OR CIVIL DETAINEES.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES
SERVICES TO A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION
FACILITY IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S CAPACITY AS:
(I) A LICENSED HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER; OR
(II) A SECURITY GUARD CERTIFIED UNDER TITLE 19, SUBTITLE
4 OF THE BUSINESS OCCUPATIONS AND PROFESSIONS ARTICLE.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL SUBJECT TO THIS SUBSECTION SHALL REPORT TO
THE COMMISSION:

SENATE BILL 985 7
(I) A VIOLATION OF THE MINIMUM MANDATORY STANDARDS
THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS REASON TO BELIEVE HAS BEEN COMMITTED BY A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY; AND
(II) A KNOWN BREACH OF THE SECURITY OF A SYSTEM OF A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY.
(3) IF THE REGULATING BODY FOR A LICENSED HEALTH CARE
PRACTITIONER OR A CERTIFIED SECURITY GUARD DETERMINES THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL HAS FAILED TO SUBMIT A REPORT IN VIOLATION OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE LICENSING BODY SHALL TAKE APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY
ACTION.
(C) A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY
MAY NOT RETALIATE AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE FOR SUBMITTING, IN GOOD FAITH, A
REPORT OF A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION.
8–111.2.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ON OR BEFORE
JULY 1, 2026, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, EACH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY AND
IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY IN THE STATE SHALL SUBMIT A CERTIFICATION
TO THE COMMISSION THAT THE FACILITY:
(I) HAS ADEQUATE AND RELIABLE UTILITIES THAT COMPLY
WITH STATE AND LOCAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS, INCLUDING POTABLE WATER,
SEWER, AND ELECTRICITY;
(II) HAS FUNCTIONAL HEATING, VENTILATION, AND AIR
CONDITIONING;
(III) MAINTAINS AN EMERGENCY POWER SYSTEM TO ENSURE
THE SAFE OPERATION OF THE FACILITY IN THE EVENT OF A DISRUPTION IN
ELECTRICAL POWER; AND
(IV) MAINTAINS AN EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN TO
RESPOND TO UTILITY DISRUPTIONS, A BREACH OF THE SECURITY OF A SYSTEM,
FIRES, AND MEDICAL EMERGENCIES.
(2) (I) A FACILITY SHALL SUBMIT A COPY OF THE EMERGENCY
OPERATIONS PLAN UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(IV) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITH THE
CERTIFICATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

SENATE BILL 985
(II) THE EMERGENCY OPERATIONS PLAN SHALL BE REVIEWED
AND UPDATED BY THE FACILITY AT LEAST ANNUALLY.
(3) THE FACILITY SHALL INCLUDE SUFFICIENT DOCUMENTATION TO
SUPPORT THE BASIS FOR THE CERTIFICATION AND PROMPTLY RESPOND TO
REQUESTS FOR ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM THE COMMISSION.
(B) IF A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION
FACILITY HAS A MATERIAL CHANGE IN OPERATIONS OR A MATERIAL INCREASE IN
OCCUPANCY, THE FACILITY SHALL SUBMIT AN UPDATED CERTIFICATION TO THE
COMMISSION WITHIN 30 DAYS OF THE CHANGE.
(C) IF A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION
FACILITY FAILS TO SUBMIT THE CERTIFICATION OR SUPPORTING DOCUMENTATION
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) DETERMINE THAT THE FACILITY IS LIFE–THREATENING OR
HEALTH–ENDANGERING AND ORDER THE IMMEDIATE CESSATION OF OPERATION OF
THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR THE IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–115 OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) TAKE ANY OTHER ACTION NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE HEALTH
AND SAFETY OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS OR CIVIL DETAINEES.
8–112.
(a) (1) The Commission shall:
(i) advise the Secretary regarding all:
1. minimum mandatory standards FOR STATE AND LOCAL
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES AND IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITIES LOCATED IN
THE STATE; and
2. approved standards for State and local correctional
facilities;
(ii) consult and coordinate with national bodies promulgating
[correctional] standards FOR CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES AND IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITIES to provide reasonable compatibility between the State standards
and nationally established standards; and

SENATE BILL 985 9
(iii) consult and cooperate with other units of the State and local
jurisdictions concerning [correctional] standards FOR CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES AND
IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITIES.
(2) The Commission may provide technical assistance to the extent
authorized in the State budget to aid the State and local jurisdictions in their efforts to
comply with minimum mandatory standards and approved standards.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out this subtitle.
(c) The Commission shall employ a staff necessary to carry out this subtitle as
provided in the State budget.
8–113.
(a) The Commission shall:
(1) establish and implement a process to inspect State and local
correctional facilities AND IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITIES LOCATED IN THE
STATE to determine and certify compliance with applicable standards; and
(2) determine deadlines for remedial action and reinspection whenever
inspection reports indicate noncompliance with applicable standards.
(b) The Commission may review and act on appeals from staff inspection reports.
(C) THE COMMISSION MAY CONDUCT AN INSPECTION IN CONJUNCTION
WITH AN APPROPRIATE UNIT OF STATE OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT, SUCH AS THE
STATE FIRE MARSHAL OR THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH.
(D) (1) THE MANAGING OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEES OF A CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY OR THE OWNER, OPERATOR, MANAGER, OR EMPLOYEES OF AN
IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY MAY NOT RESTRICT, PREVENT, OR OTHERWISE
IMPEDE AN INSPECTION FROM BEING CONDUCTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SUBTITLE.
(2) IF ANY INDIVIDUAL VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION SHALL ORDER THE IMMEDIATE CESSATION OF
OPERATION OF THE APPLICABLE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITY.
8–114.

SENATE BILL 985
(a) (1) If the Commission determines that a correctional facility OR AN
IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY is in violation of the minimum mandatory
standards, the Commission shall send a compliance plan to the [correctional] facility.
(2) The compliance plan shall state:
(i) which minimum mandatory standards the [correctional] facility
has violated;
(ii) the time, to be determined by the Commission, that the
[correctional] facility has to address the violations; and
(iii) the date that the Commission shall reinspect the [correctional]
facility to determine if the [correctional] facility has complied with the minimum
mandatory standards.
(3) The Commission shall send a copy of the compliance plan to the
executive and legislative body responsible for the [correctional] facility.
(b) (1) If, after sending a compliance plan and reinspecting a correctional
facility OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY under subsection (a) of this section,
the Commission determines that the [correctional] facility is in violation of the minimum
mandatory standards, the Commission shall send a letter of reprimand to the [correctional]
facility.
(2) The letter of reprimand shall state:
(i) which minimum standards the [correctional] facility has
violated;
(ii) the time, to be determined by the Commission but not to exceed
60 days, that the [correctional] facility has to address the violations; and
(iii) the date that the Commission will reinspect the [correctional]
facility to determine if the [correctional] facility has complied with the minimum
mandatory standards.
(3) The Commission shall send a copy of the letter of reprimand to the
executive and legislative body responsible for the [correctional] facility.
(c) (1) If, after the Commission has sent a letter of reprimand to a correctional
facility OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY under subsection (b) of this section
and reinspected the facility, the Commission determines that the [correctional] facility is
in violation of the minimum mandatory standards, the Commission shall:

SENATE BILL 985 11
(i) conduct a full standards and performance audit of the
[correctional] facility; or
(ii) periodically inspect the [correctional] facility until compliance is
attained and send a report of each inspection to the executive and legislative bodies
responsible for the [correctional] facility.
(2) When conducting a full standards and performance audit of a
[correctional] facility, the Commission shall examine:
(i) the physical condition of the [correctional] facility;
(ii) the safety and treatment of incarcerated individuals OR CIVIL
DETAINEES at the [correctional] facility, AS APPLICABLE;
(iii) whether the [correctional] facility has policies and procedures in
place as required by the minimum mandatory standards; and
(iv) whether the [correctional] facility is following the required
policies and procedures.
(3) When conducting a full standards and performance audit, the
Commission shall have unrestricted access to the personnel and records of the
[correctional] facility.
(4) (i) If the Commission lacks the expertise necessary to perform a part
of the full standards and performance audit, the Commission may obtain assistance from
sources with expertise in the specific standard.
(ii) If the Commission needs to obtain assistance, the [correctional]
facility that is being audited shall reimburse the Commission for any cost incurred.
(5) (i) After completing a full standards and performance audit, the
Commission shall send a letter to the [correctional] facility.
(ii) The letter shall contain:
1. a copy of the audit findings, including details on all areas
where the [correctional] facility fails to comply with the minimum mandatory standards;
2. a statement of what actions the [correctional] facility
must take in order to comply with the audit findings;
3. a date when the [correctional] facility must comply with
the audit findings; and

SENATE BILL 985
4. a statement that the Commission will conduct an
unannounced inspection of the [correctional] facility within a reasonable amount of time
after the date specified for compliance and that if the [correctional] facility fails to comply,
the Commission may seek a court order requiring compliance or order all or part of the
[correctional] facility to cease operations.
(iii) The Commission shall send a copy of the letter to the executive
and legislative bodies responsible for the [correctional] facility.
(6) Within a reasonable time after the date specified for compliance, the
Commission shall conduct an unannounced inspection to verify that the [correctional]
facility has complied with the audit findings.
(d) (1) If, after performing an audit and unannounced inspection under
subsection (c) of this section and holding a hearing on the issue, the Commission determines
that a [correctional] facility has not complied with the audit findings, the Commission
shall, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE ATTORNEY GENERAL:
(i) petition a circuit court with venue over the proceeding for a court
order requiring the [correctional] facility to comply with the audit findings; or
(ii) issue an order to cease operation of the [correctional] facility or
any of its [correctional] elements, procedures, or functions.
(2) The Commission shall provide to a [correctional] facility reasonable
notice of a hearing under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) The Commission may subpoena witnesses and hold public hearings in
accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article before making a final
decision on whether to seek a court order or close a [correctional] facility or any of its
[correctional] elements, procedures, or functions.
8–114.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A PRIVATE ENTITY THAT OWNS, MANAGES,
OR OPERATES, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY OR AN
IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY.
(B) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ACTION AUTHORIZED BY THIS SUBTITLE,
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A PRIVATE ENTITY FOR:
(1) RETALIATING AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE FOR SUBMITTING A REPORT
OF A VIOLATION IN VIOLATION OF § 8–111.1(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE;

SENATE BILL 985 13
(2) FAILING TO COMPLY WITH THE CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
UNDER § 8–111.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) IMPEDING A COMMISSION INSPECTION IN VIOLATION OF §
8–113(D)(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(4) FAILING TO COMPLY WITH THE AUDIT FINDINGS OF THE
COMMISSION UNDER § 8–114(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY SEEK:
(1) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO $10,000 FOR EACH VIOLATION
PAYABLE INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE;
(3) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE RELIEF.
(D) EACH DAY THAT A PRIVATE ENTITY FAILS TO CORRECT A VIOLATION
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) THROUGH (4) OF THIS SECTION SHALL CONSTITUTE A
SEPARATE VIOLATION.
8–115.
(a) If the Commission or an authorized inspector finds a condition in a
correctional facility OR AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY that is life threatening
or health endangering, the Commission or inspector may order the immediate cessation of
operation.
(b) Within 96 hours after an order is issued under subsection (a) of this section,
the Commission shall hold a review hearing to confirm or countermand the order.
(c) (1) (I) If a correctional facility is ordered closed under this section, all
incarcerated individuals in the facility shall be transferred to and accepted in a suitable
place of detention, as the Secretary determines.
(II) IF AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY IS ORDERED
CLOSED UNDER THIS SECTION, ALL CIVIL DETAINEES IN THE FACILITY SHALL BE
TRANSFERRED TO AND ACCEPTED IN A SUITABLE PLACE OF DETENTION, AS
DETERMINED BY THE APPROPRIATE STATE OR FEDERAL ENTITY.

SENATE BILL 985
(2) The STATE, LOCAL governing body, OR FEDERAL ENTITY responsible
for the cost of the closed facility shall pay the expenses incurred in transferring and
maintaining incarcerated individuals OR CIVIL DETAINEES under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
8–116.
(a) (1) The Commission shall establish advisory boards to assist the
Commission in carrying out its powers and duties under this subtitle.
(2) The Commission may establish advisory boards on [adult]:
(i) ADULT detention centers and lockups;
(ii) ADULT community correctional facilities; [and]
(iii) ADULT correctional facilities other than those listed in items (i)
and (ii) of this paragraph; AND
(IV) IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITIES.
(b) The chairperson of the Commission shall appoint the members of an advisory
board with the approval of the Commission.
(c) The chairperson of an advisory board shall be a Commission member.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Commission on
Correctional Standards and the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall
adopt emergency regulations required under Title 8, Subtitle 1 of the Correctional Services
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before June 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.